District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.06

Rules of procedure.

The Commission shall develop its own rules of procedure, except they shall provide that the Commission shall meet at least every other month.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 406, 22 DCR 2461
1981 Ed., § 6-2226.
1973 Ed., § 6-1726.